Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-6,108
Excise tax; amount; credits and refunds; allocation.

Each retailer shall, in addition to all other taxes provided by law, pay an excise tax at the rate set pursuant to section 66-4,144 on all gallons or gallon equivalents of compressed fuel sold for use in registered motor vehicles. All sums of money received under this section shall be credited to the Highway Trust Fund. Credits and refunds of such tax allowed to retailers shall be paid from the Highway Trust Fund. The balance of the amount credited, after credits and refunds, shall be allocated to the Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund if bonds are issued pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-2223 and to the Highway Cash Fund if no bonds are issued pursuant to such subsection.

Laws 1995, LB 182, § 12.